Alabama, session 2026rs, HB409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
10 Section 1. (a) The Mayor of the City of Alabaster shall
11 designate a city official or employee to serve as the
12 enforcing official for public nuisances related to plants in
13 the city.
14 (b) The enforcing official may serve written notice
15 upon the owner of any property in the city informing the owner
16 that a nuisance is located on the property and ordering the
17 abatement of the nuisance.
18 (c)(1) The written notice shall require the owner to
19 complete the abatement of the nuisance within 14 days from
20 service of the notice. Upon finding that the difficulty of the
21 abatement or other unusual factors necessitate additional
22 time, the enforcing official may provide the owner up to 28
23 days from service of the notice to complete the abatement.
24 (2) The written notice shall notify the owner that, in
25 lieu of completing the abatement within the time stated in the
26 notice, the owner may appear at a hearing before the
27 administrative official to determine whether the conditions on
28 the property constitute a public nuisance that should be
Page 1

the property constitute a public nuisance that should be
HB409 Enrolled
29 abated. The owner shall notify the enforcing official of the
30 owner's intent to appear at the hearing within five days of
31 service of the written notice. The hearing shall take place at
32 least 10 days after service of the written notice.
33 (3) The written notice shall apprise the owner of the
34 facts of the alleged nuisance, including a description or
35 address of the property that provides reasonable notice of its
36 location; the address of the enforcing official; and the date,
37 time, and place of the hearing before the administrative
38 official.
39 (d)(1) The enforcing official, on or before the date of
40 service of the written notice on the owner, shall post the
41 written notice in a conspicuous place on the property on which
42 the nuisance is located.
43 (2) The enforcing official shall serve the owner with
44 the written notice in one of the following methods:
45 a. By hand delivering it to the owner.
46 b. By mailing it to the owner at the owner's last known
47 address by first class mail.
48 c. By leaving it at the owner's residence or place of
49 business with an individual of suitable age and discretion
50 residing or employed at that location.
51 d. If the owner is not an individual, by delivering it
52 to an agent of the owner.
53 (3) Service by first class mail is complete upon
54 mailing.
55 (e)(1) The enforcing official may rely upon information
56 appearing on record in the office of the county tax collector,
Page 2

appearing on record in the office of the county tax collector,
HB409 Enrolled
57 tax assessor, or revenue commissioner to establish the
58 identity of any owner of property and to establish the owner's
59 last known address. Use of this information shall be deemed
60 conclusive and sufficient proof of the information.
61 (2) The enforcing official may use any additional means
62 of providing notice that he or she deems appropriate,
63 including, but not limited to, posting notice in one or more
64 public places within the city or publishing notice in a
65 newspaper of general circulation in the city.
66 Section 2. (a) The city council shall designate an
67 individual other than the enforcing official to serve as the
68 administrative official for the purposes of this act.
69 (b) Upon receipt of an owner's intent to appear at a
70 hearing, the administrative official shall suspend the order
71 to abate.
72 (c) The administrative official, upon agreement with
73 the owner, may reschedule the hearing or continue the hearing
74 for good cause.
75 (d) A hearing held pursuant to this act shall be open
76 to the public. Any interested party may present evidence or
77 testimony. The city shall keep a record of the proceedings as
78 part of the city's public records.
79 (e) Within five days after the conclusion of a hearing,
80 the administrative official shall render a written decision on
81 the merits of the proposed abatement. The administrative
82 official shall deliver the written decision to the owner and
83 the enforcing official by personal service or by first class
84 mail.
Page 3

mail.
HB409 Enrolled
85 (f) If the administrative official determines that a
86 nuisance does not exist, the notice to abate is void. The
87 determination does not bar any subsequent public nuisance
88 notice at the same property.
89 (g) If the administrative official determines that a
90 nuisance does exist, the written decision shall inform the
91 owner that the nuisance must be abated within 14 days from
92 service of the determination. Upon finding that the difficulty
93 of the abatement or other unusual factors necessitate
94 additional time, the administrative official may provide the
95 owner up to 28 days from service of the determination to
96 complete the abatement.
97 (h) An owner, within 10 days after receipt of a
98 determination, may appeal the determination to the circuit
99 court by filing with the circuit court clerk a notice of
100 appeal and bond for security of costs in the form and amount
101 approved by the circuit clerk. Upon receipt of an adequate
102 notice of appeal and bond, the circuit clerk shall serve a
103 copy of the notice of appeal on the city clerk and the appeal
104 shall be docketed in the circuit court and shall be a
105 preferred case. Upon receipt of the notice, the city clerk
106 shall file with the circuit clerk a copy of the finding and
107 determination of the administrative official. Any trial shall
108 be held without a jury.
109 Section 3. (a) If a nuisance is not abated within the
110 time permitted by the enforcing official's non-suspended
111 notice or, following a hearing attended by the owner, within
112 the time permitted by the administrative official's
Page 4

the time permitted by the administrative official's
HB409 Enrolled
113 determination, then the city may enter upon the property and
114 abate the nuisance or contract for the abatement of the
115 nuisance. However, if an appeal has been filed pursuant to
116 this act, then the city may not abate the nuisance until the
117 determination or judgment authorizing abatement becomes final
118 as provided by law.
119 (b) Upon completion of abatement work by or under
120 contract with the city, the enforcing official shall create an
121 itemized list of the city's expenses in abating the nuisance,
122 including, but not limited to, the cost of labor, value of the
123 use of equipment, advertising expenses, postage,
124 administrative expenses, legal expenses, or materials
125 purchased.
126 (c) The itemized statement and a notice of the time
127 fixed by the city council to consider the assessment of the
128 costs against the property shall be sent by first class mail
129 to the last known address of the owner of the property at
130 least five days before the fixed time.
131 (d) At the fixed time, the city council shall receive
132 and consider the itemized statement and any objections which
133 may be raised by the owner of the property. The council may
134 modify the statement as necessary. Following all due
135 consideration, the council may adopt a resolution assessing
136 the appropriate costs. The costs stated in the resolution
137 shall constitute a lien on the property and shall be referred
138 to as a weed lien on the property.
139 (e) The city council shall provide a copy of any
140 resolution adopted pursuant to this section to the county
Page 5

resolution adopted pursuant to this section to the county
HB409 Enrolled
141 revenue commissioner. The county revenue commissioner shall
142 add the costs of the weed lien to the next regular bill for
143 taxes levied against the property subject to the weed lien,
144 and the costs shall be collected and remitted to the city at
145 the same time and in the same manner as ordinary municipal ad
146 valorem taxes are collected and remitted. The weed lien shall
147 be subject to the same penalties and the same procedure under
148 foreclosure and sale in the case of delinquency as ordinary
149 municipal ad valorem taxes. However, in a foreclosure and sale
150 resulting solely due to a delinquency caused by a weed lien,
151 the city shall reimburse the county for all costs associated
152 with the foreclosure and sale unless the costs are collected
153 at the time of the sale as part of the sale.
154 Section 4. When a weed lien has been filed with the
155 revenue commissioner against a lot or parcel of land pursuant
156 to this act, a subsequent redemption of the lot or parcel by a
157 person authorized to redeem, or a sale of the lot or parcel by
158 the state, shall include payment of any outstanding weed lien.
159 Upon full payment of a weed lien as part of a redemption or
160 sale, the lien shall be extinguished. If a weed lien is not
161 paid as part of a redemption or sale, it shall remain a valid
162 and enforceable lien against the property until satisfied.
163 Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
164 1, 2026.
Page 6

1, 2026.
HB409 Enrolled
165
166
167
168
169
170
171
172
173
174
175 ________________________________________________
176 Speaker of the House of Representatives
177
178
179
180 ________________________________________________
181 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
182
183
184 House of Representatives
185
186 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
187 was passed by the House 17-Feb-26.
188
189 John Treadwell
190 Clerk
191
192
193
194
195
196 Senate 24-Feb-26 Passed
197
198
199
Page 7